Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.010

Employment of superintendent—Superintendent's qualifications, general powers, term, contract renewal.

In all districts the board of directors shall elect a superintendent who shall have such qualification as the local school board alone shall determine. The superintendent shall have supervision over the several departments of the schools thereof and carry out such other powers and duties as prescribed by law. Notwithstanding the provisions of *RCW 28A.400.300(1), the board may contract with such superintendent for a term not to exceed three years when deemed in the best interest of the district. The right to renew a contract of employment with any school superintendent shall rest solely with the discretion of the school board employing such school superintendent. Regarding such renewal of contracts of school superintendents the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, and 28A.645.010 shall be inapplicable.

[ 1990 c 33 s 376; 1985 c 7 s 94; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 10; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 10. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 254 s 2; 1975-'76 1st ex.s. c 137 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.137; prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 300 s 11; RRS s 4821. Formerly RCW 28.63.060. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 302 s 8; RRS s 4830. Formerly RCW 28.63.062. (iii) 1909 c 97 p 302 s 9; RRS s 4831. Formerly RCW 28.63.064. (iv) 1909 c 97 p 290 s 4, part; RRS s 4793, part. Formerly RCW 28A.58.137, 28.62.040, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.400.300 was amended by 2012 c 186 s 20, changing subsection (1) to subsection (1)(a).

Savings—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: "Nothing in this 1976 amendatory act shall be construed to annul or to modify or to preclude the continuation of any lawful agreement entered into prior to the effective date of this 1976 amendatory act." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 11.]

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: "If any provision of this 1976 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 12.]

Reimbursement of expenses of directors, other school representatives, and superintendent candidates—Advancing anticipated expenses: RCW 28A.320.050.